Utah statutes.
48-2a-804 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

(1)  to creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under Section 48-2a-601 or 48-2a-604;

(2)  except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under Section 48-2a-601 or 48-2a-604; and

(3)  except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners with respect to their partnership interests:

(a)  for the return of their contributions; and

(b)  in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

